New Jersey, session 221, S785.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall not enter into or renew a contract for administration of the electronic toll collection system unless that contract includes a process to provide a customer the option to select an automatic replenishment amount and change the automatic replenishment amount at any time.  This process shall, at minimum, provide a customer the option to select from multiple pre-determined automatic replenishment amounts or to choose the customers own automatic replenishment amount. b.    The New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall publish, on its Internet website, information concerning a customers ability to choose and change an automatic replenishment amount pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 2.    a. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the South Jersey Transportation Authority shall not enter into or renew a contract for administration of the electronic toll collection system unless that contract includes a process to provide a customer the option to select an automatic replenishment amount and change the automatic replenishment amount at any time.  This process shall, at minimum, provide a customer the option to select from multiple pre-determined automatic replenishment amounts or to choose the customers own automatic replenishment amount. b.    The South Jersey Transportation Authority shall publish, on its Internet website, information concerning a customers ability to choose and change an automatic replenishment amount pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately but the provisions of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not be construed as affecting the terms of any contract or agreement in effect as of the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).